Indiana, session 2026, HB1317.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.30-2006,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The commission shall in all controversial
proceedings heard by it be an impartial fact-finding body and shall
make its orders in such cases upon the facts impartially found by it. The
commission shall in no such proceeding, during the hearing, act in the
role either of a proponent or opponent on any issue to be decided by it.
All evidence given in any such proceeding shall be offered on behalf
of the respective parties to, or appearing in, the proceeding and not in
the name or behalf of the commission itself.
(b) Any report, audit, examination, or analysis prepared by the
commission staff at the request or direction of the commission may be
made a part of the record of the proceeding, subject to
cross-examination by any party of the person who performed or
directed the preparation of the report, audit, examination, or analysis.
(c) If in any such proceeding the public interest is not otherwise
adequately represented by counsel, in the opinion of the commission,
2026 IN 1317—LS 6781/DI 101


it shall be the duty of the utility consumer counselor, if requested by the
commission, to make adequate preparation for the presentation of the
interests of the public in such proceeding and the utility consumer
counselor shall at the hearing represent the public interests therein
involved.
(d) However, nothing in this section prevents the commission from
instituting, prosecuting, hearing, or determining any investigation or
proceeding which it is authorized to do, or make, on its own motion by
any law with the administration of which it is charged.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no member or
employee of the commission assigned to make findings of fact and
conclusions of law in a formally docketed evidentiary proceeding may
communicate in connection with any issue of fact or law disputed in
that proceeding with any party or any party's representative, except on
notice and with opportunity for all parties to participate.
(f) In addition to holding an executive session in the instances
described in IC 5-14-1.5-6.1(b), the commission may hold an executive
session to deliberate on a proposed order if all the following are
satisfied:
(1) All evidence on the matter has been received by the
commission.
(2) The deliberations are preparatory to taking final action on an
order subject to judicial review.
(3) Only the following are permitted to participate in the
executive session:
(A) Commission members.
(B) Commission employees who are formally assigned to
advise or assist in preparing the order, including the
commission's technical staff and attorneys.
IC 5-14-1.5-5, IC 5-14-1.5-6.1, and IC 5-14-1.5-7 apply to an executive
session held under this subsection.
(g) A person who violates this section commits a Class C infraction.
(h) Notwithstanding IC 5-11-1-25 or any other law, every three
(3) years, beginning in 2026, the state board of accounts shall
conduct an audit of the commission's funds, accounts, financial
affairs, and all compliance related matters for the state fiscal year
ending in the year in which the audit is conducted. A report of an
audit conducted under this subsection shall be submitted to the
executive director of the legislative services agency for distribution
to the members of the general assembly not later than November
1 of the calendar year that includes the end of the state fiscal year
covered by the report. The report submitted to the executive
2026 IN 1317—LS 6781/DI 101


director of the legislative services agency under this subdivision
must be in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 2. IC 8-1-2-58.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 58.1. (a) As used in this
chapter, "affiliate" means any person who directly or indirectly:
(1) controls;
(2) is controlled by; or
(3) is under the common control of;
another person. The term includes a parent company or a
subsidiary.
(b) As used in this section, "public utility" means an investor
owned utility that:
(1) provides utility service in Indiana to the public for
compensation; and
(2) is under the jurisdiction of the commission for the
approval of rates and charges.
The term includes an affiliate of the public utility.
(c) As used in this section, "utility service" means:
(1) electric;
(2) natural gas;
(3) water; or
(4) wastewater;
service that is provided at retail.
(d) The commission:
(1) may, with good cause, as part of:
(A) an examination or audit under section 17 of this
chapter;
(B) an inquiry under section 115 of this chapter; or
(C) an investigation:
(i) on its own motion under section 58 of this chapter;
(ii) upon a complaint made under section 54 of this
chapter; or
(iii) at the request of the utility consumer counselor;
conduct a forensic audit of a public utility; and
(2) shall as part of a base rate case that is:
(A) filed with; or
(B) pending before;
the commission after December 31, 2025, for a change in a
public utility's basic rates and charges, conduct a forensic
audit of the public utility.
(e) The commission may appoint under section 51 of this
2026 IN 1317—LS 6781/DI 101


chapter:
(1) an independent accounting firm; or
(2) another qualified agent;
with experience or expertise in conducting forensic audits to
conduct a forensic audit under this section.
(f) Subject to subsection (g), a forensic audit of a public utility
under this section may include one (1) or more of the following:
(1) An examination of the accuracy of the accounts and
reports of the public utility.
(2) An examination of specific transactions or documents of
the public utility.
(3) Subject to section 74 of this chapter, interviews of officers,
employees, or contractors of the public utility.
(4) An examination of the public utility's:
(A) lobbying activities;
(B) legislative action efforts; or
(C) other political activities;
including the amounts and recipients of expenditures made in
connection with those activities or efforts.
(5) Any other examination or investigation necessary to
determine whether the public utility has complied with state
law or the commission's rules and orders.
(g) In accordance with section 62 of this chapter, the
commission or the commission's agent has the power to administer
oaths, certify official acts, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance
of witnesses, and compel the production of books, accounts, papers,
records, documents, and testimony in connection with a forensic
audit conducted under this section. However, upon request of the
public utility subject to the forensic audit, the commission shall
determine whether any testimony or materials provided in
connection with the forensic audit:
(1) are confidential under IC 5-14-3-4;
(2) are exempt from public access and disclosure by Indiana
law; and
(3) must be treated as confidential and protected from public
access and disclosure by the commission.
(h) Upon the completion of a forensic audit under this section,
the commission may do one (1) or more of the following:
(1) In an order issued:
(A) under section 69 of this chapter; or
(B) in a base rate case described in subsection (d)(2);
as applicable, direct the public utility to take such actions as
2026 IN 1317—LS 6781/DI 101


the commission determines necessary to correct or cure any
acts or practices examined as part of the audit and found to be
unjust, unreasonable, unsafe, insufficient, preferential,
unjustly discriminatory, or in violation of any provisions of
state law or the commission's rules and orders.
(2) Refer any suspected criminal activities uncovered during
the audit to an appropriate law enforcement agency or
prosecutorial agency or official.
(i) Expenses incurred by the commission or the commission's
agent in conducting a forensic audit under this section shall be
charged and paid in the manner provided in IC 8-1-6. Expenses for
witnesses who appear before the commission or the commission's
agent in connection with a forensic audit shall be paid by:
(1) the state; or
(2) parties other than the commission;
as prescribed by section 63 of this chapter.
SECTION 3. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1317—LS 6781/DI 101